Utah statutes.
63K-4-301.   Local emergency -- Declarations.
(1) (a)  A local emergency may be declared by proclamation of the chief
executive officer of a political subdivision.
(b)  A local emergency shall not be continued or renewed for a period in
excess of 30 days except by or with the consent of the governing body of the
political subdivision.
(c)  Any order or proclamation declaring, continuing, or terminating a local
emergency shall be filed promptly with the office of the clerk of the affected
political subdivision.
(2)  A declaration of a local emergency:
(a)  constitutes an official recognition that a disaster situation exists
within the affected political subdivision;
(b)  provides a legal basis for requesting and obtaining state or federal
government disaster assistance;
(c)  activates the response and recovery aspects of any and all applicable
local disaster emergency plans; and
(d)  authorizes the furnishing of aid and assistance in relation to the
proclamation.
(3)  A local emergency proclamation issued under this section shall state:
(a)  the nature of the local emergency;
(b)  the area or areas that are affected or threatened; and
(c)  the conditions which caused the emergency.
